Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-963
Executive director; employer and employee; furnish information.

Every employer and school employee shall send to the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, as specified in section 79-906, upon request and in the manner required by the executive director, such information as he or she may require (1) for the identification of school employees and (2) for the determination of the membership of the retirement system and the obligations of the employer and school employee to the retirement system.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 37, p. 650;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2937;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 470, p. 852;

Laws 1951, c. 293, § 4, p. 972;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 11, p. 2782;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1536;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 598;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 18;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 37;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 23.
July 18, 2026